Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-518
Automobile liability policy; notice of intention not to renew; reason.

If an insurer shall refuse to renew a policy, as provided for in section 44-517, the insurer shall, upon written request of the named insured, mailed or delivered not less than fifteen days prior to the effective date of such notice of intention not to renew, specify in writing the reason for such refusal to renew. Such reason shall be mailed or delivered to the named insured within five days after receipt of such request.

Laws 1972, LB 1396, § 5.